Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Education shall establish an advisory committee to
study and develop recommendations to modernize the adequate service levels  for early
intervention and early childhood special education in this state.
(2) In  developing recommendations under subsection (1) of this section, the advisory
committee shall consider:
(a) The latest research on recommended levels and  types of services that are effective
for children with disabilities or developmental delay.
(b) The experience of families with individualized family service plans.
(c) The experience  of families working with providers of early intervention and early
childhood special education services.
(3) The  department shall, to the extent practical and at a minimum, appoint members
to the advisory committee as follows:
(a) One member who  is an educator employed in an early intervention and early child-
hood special education program.
(b) One member who is a therapist employed in an early intervention and  early childhood
special education program.
(c) One member with a child who  is enrolled in an early intervention and early childhood
special education program.
(d) One member with expertise in budgeting for an  early intervention and early childhood
special education program.
(e) Members from policy organizations  with expertise related to early intervention and
early childhood special education, K-12 education or early learning systems.
(f) One member who is a representative  of the Department of Early Learning and Care
with expertise in the preschool and child care systems in Oregon.
(4) The advisory committee shall  submit the recommendations described in subsection
(1) of this section as a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245,  and may include re-
commendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related
to education no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
Enrolled House Bill 2682 (HB 2682-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by House March 4, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 6, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2682 (HB 2682-INTRO) Page 2